Utah statutes.
73-5-15.   Groundwater management plan.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Critical management area" means a groundwater basin in which the
groundwater withdrawals consistently exceed the safe yield.
(b)  "Safe yield" means the amount of groundwater that can be withdrawn from a
groundwater basin over a period of time without exceeding the long-term
recharge of the basin or unreasonably affecting the basin's physical and
chemical integrity.
(2) (a)  The state engineer may regulate groundwater withdrawals within a
specific groundwater basin by adopting a groundwater management plan in
accordance with this section for any groundwater basin or aquifer or
combination of hydrologically connected groundwater basins or aquifers.
(b)  The objectives of a groundwater management plan are to:
(i)  limit groundwater withdrawals to safe yield;
(ii)  protect the physical integrity of the aquifer; and
(iii)  protect water quality.
(c)  The state engineer shall adopt a groundwater management plan for a
groundwater basin if more than 1/3 of the water right owners in the
groundwater basin request that the state engineer adopt a groundwater
management plan.
(3) (a)  In developing a groundwater management plan, the state engineer may
consider:
(i)  the hydrology of the groundwater basin;
(ii)  the physical characteristics of the groundwater basin;
(iii)  the relationship between surface water and groundwater, including
whether the groundwater should be managed in conjunction with hydrologically
connected surface waters;
(iv)  the geographic spacing and location of groundwater withdrawals;
(v)  water quality;
(vi)  local well interference; and
(vii)  other relevant factors.
(b)  The state engineer shall base the provisions of a groundwater management
plan on the principles of prior appropriation.
(c) (i)  The state engineer shall use the best available scientific method to
determine safe yield.
(ii)  As hydrologic conditions change or additional information becomes
available, safe yield determinations made by the state engineer may be revised
by following the procedures listed in Subsection (5).
(4) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), the withdrawal of water
from a groundwater basin shall be limited to the basin's safe yield.
(ii)  Before limiting withdrawals in a groundwater basin to safe yield, the
state engineer shall:
(A)  determine the groundwater basin's safe yield; and
(B)  adopt a groundwater management plan for the groundwater basin.
(iii)  If the state engineer determines that groundwater withdrawals in a
groundwater basin exceed the safe yield, the state engineer shall regulate
groundwater rights in that groundwater basin based on the priority date of the
water rights under the groundwater management plan, unless a voluntary
arrangement exists under Subsection (4)(c) that requires a different
distribution.
(b)  When adopting a groundwater management plan for a critical management
area, the state engineer shall, based on economic and other impacts to an
individual water user or a local community caused by the implementation of
safe yield limits on withdrawals, allow gradual implementation of the
groundwater management plan.
(c) (i)  In consultation with the state engineer, water users in a groundwater
basin may agree to participate in a voluntary arrangement for managing
withdrawals at any time, either before or after a determination that
groundwater withdrawals exceed the groundwater basin's safe yield.
(ii)  A voluntary arrangement under Subsection (4)(c)(i) shall be consistent
with other law.
(iii)  The adoption of a voluntary arrangement under this Subsection (4)(c) by
less than all of the water users in a groundwater basin does not affect the
rights of water users who do not agree to the voluntary arrangement.
(5)  To adopt a groundwater management plan, the state engineer shall:
(a)  give notice as specified in Subsection (7) at least 30 days before the
first public meeting held in accordance with Subsection (5)(b):
(i)  that the state engineer proposes to adopt a groundwater management plan;
(ii)  describing generally the land area proposed to be included in the
groundwater management plan; and
(iii)  stating the location, date, and time of each public meeting to be held
in accordance with Subsection (5)(b);
(b)  hold one or more public meetings in the geographic area proposed to be
included within the groundwater management plan to:
(i)  address the need for a groundwater management plan;
(ii)  present any data, studies, or reports that the state engineer intends to
consider in preparing the groundwater management plan;
(iii)  address safe yield and any other subject that may be included in the
groundwater management plan;
(iv)  outline the estimated administrative costs, if any, that groundwater
users are likely to incur if the plan is adopted; and
(v)  receive any public comments and other information presented at the public
meeting, including comments from any of the entities listed in Subsection
(7)(a)(iii);
(c)  receive and consider written comments concerning the proposed groundwater
management plan from any person for a period determined by the state engineer
of not less than 60 days after the day on which the notice required by
Subsection (5)(a) is given;
(d) (i)  at least 60 days prior to final adoption of the groundwater
management plan, publish notice:
(A)  that a draft of the groundwater management plan has been proposed; and
(B)  specifying where a copy of the draft plan may be reviewed; and
(ii)  promptly provide a copy of the draft plan in printed or electronic form
to each of the entities listed in Subsection (7)(a)(iii) that makes written
request for a copy; and
(e)  provide notice of the adoption of the groundwater management plan.
(6)  A groundwater management plan shall become effective on the date notice
of adoption is completed under Subsection (7), or on a later date if specified
in the plan.
(7) (a)  A notice required by this section shall be:
(i)  published:
(A)  once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county that encompasses a portion of the land area
proposed to be included within the groundwater management plan; and
(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks;
(ii)  published conspicuously on the state engineer's Internet website; and
(iii)  mailed to each of the following that has within its boundaries a
portion of the land area to be included within the proposed groundwater
management plan:
(A)  county;
(B)  incorporated city or town;
(C)  improvement district under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 4, Improvement
District Act;
(D)  service area, under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 9, Service Area Act;
(E)  drainage district, under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 2, Drainage District
Act;
(F)  irrigation district, under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 5, Irrigation
District Act;
(G)  metropolitan water district, under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 6,
Metropolitan Water District Act;
(H)  special service district providing water, sewer, drainage, or flood
control services, under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act;
(I)  water conservancy district, under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 10, Water
Conservancy District Act; and
(J)  conservation district, under Title 17D, Chapter 3, Conservation District
Act.
(b)  A notice required by this section is effective upon substantial
compliance with Subsections (7)(a)(i) through (iii).
(8)  A groundwater management plan may be amended in the same manner as a
groundwater management plan may be adopted under this section.
(9)  The existence of a groundwater management plan does not preclude any
otherwise eligible person from filing any application or challenging any
decision made by the state engineer within the affected groundwater basin.
(10) (a)  A person aggrieved by a groundwater management plan may challenge
any aspect of the groundwater management plan by filing a complaint within 60
days after the adoption of the groundwater management plan in the district
court for any county in which the groundwater basin is found.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (9), a person may challenge the components of
a groundwater management plan only in the manner provided by Subsection
(10)(a).
(c)  An action brought under this Subsection (10) is reviewed de novo by the
district court.
(d)  A person challenging a groundwater management plan under this Subsection
(10) shall join the state engineer as a defendant in the action challenging
the groundwater management plan.
(e) (i)  Within 30 days after the day on which a person files an action
challenging any aspect of a groundwater management plan under Subsection
(10)(a), the person filing the action shall publish notice of the action:
(A)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the district
court is located; and
(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks.
(ii)  The notice required by Subsection (10)(e)(i)(A) shall be published once
a week for two consecutive weeks.
(iii)  The notice required by Subsection (10)(e)(i) shall:
(A)  identify the groundwater management plan the person is challenging;
(B)  identify the case number assigned by the district court;
(C)  state that a person affected by the groundwater management plan may
petition the district court to intervene in the action challenging the
groundwater management plan; and
(D)  list the address for the clerk of the district court in which the action
is filed.
(iv) (A)  Any person affected by the groundwater management plan may petition
to intervene in the action within 60 days after the day on which notice is
last published under Subsections (10)(e)(i) and (ii).
(B)  The district court's treatment of a petition to intervene under this
Subsection (10)(e)(iv) is governed by the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.
(v)  A district court in which an action is brought under Subsection (10)(a)
shall consolidate all actions brought under that Subsection and include in the
consolidated action any person whose petition to intervene is granted.
(11)  A groundwater management plan adopted or amended in accordance with this
section is exempt from the requirements in Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(12)  Recharge and recovery projects permitted under Chapter 3b, Groundwater
Recharge and Recovery Act, are exempted from this section.
(13)  Nothing in this section may be interpreted to require the development,
implementation, or consideration of a groundwater management plan as a
prerequisite or condition to the exercise of the state engineer's enforcement
powers under other law, including powers granted under Section 73-2-25.
(14)  A groundwater management plan adopted in accordance with this section
may not apply to the dewatering of a mine.
(15) (a)  A groundwater management plan adopted by the state engineer before
May 1, 2006, remains in force and has the same legal effect as it had on the
day on which it was adopted by the state engineer.
(b)  If a groundwater management plan that existed before May 1, 2006, is
amended on or after May 1, 2006, the amendment is subject to this section's
provisions.
